en: raw cream
ca: nata crua, crema de llet crua
de: Rohe Sahne
es: nata cruda, crema de leche cruda
fr: crème crue, crème de lait cru
hr: sirovo vrhnje
it: panna cruda

en: sterilized cream
ca: nata esterilitzada, crema de llet esterilitzada
de: sterilisierte Sahne, sterilisierte Schlagsahne
es: nata esterilizada, crema de leche esterilizada
fi: sterilisoitu kerma
fr: crème stérilisée
hr: sterilizirana krema
hu: hőkezelt tejszín
it: panna sterilizzata

en: UHT cream
ca: crema de llet UHT, nata UHT
de: H-Schlagsahne, H-Sahne
es: crema de leche UHT, nata UHT
fi: UHT kerma, iskukuumennettu kerma, UHT-käsitelty kerma
fr: crème uht
hr: uht krema
hu: UHT tejszín
it: panna UHT
nl: UHT room

en: sterilized UHT cream
ca: crema de llet esterilitzada UHT, nata esterilitzada UHT
de: sterilisierte H-Sahne
es: crema de leche esterilizada UHT, nata esterilizada UHT
fi: sterilisoitu UHT kerma, sterilisoitu iskukuumennettu kerma, sterilisoitu UHT-käsitelty kerma
fr: crème stérilisée uht
hr: sterilizirana uht krema
it: panna UHT sterilizzata

fr: Crème fraîche liquide
ca: crema de llet fresca líquida, nata fresca líquida
es: crema de leche fresca líquida, nata fresca líquida

en: light cream
ca: nata lleugera, crema de llet lleugera
de: leichte Sahne
es: Nata ligera, crema de leche ligera
fi: kevytkerma
fr: crème légère, Crème fraîche légère, Crème légère fraîche
hr: svijetla krema
hu: főzőtejszín
it: crema leggera
nl: Lichte room

fr: crème fraîche légère epaisse
ca: crema de llet lleugera espessa, nata lleugera espessa
es: crema de leche ligera espesa, nata ligera espesa

en: single cream
bg: течна сметана
ca: nata líquida
de: Halbrahm, Haldsahne
fi: ruokakerma
fr: crème liquide, demi-crème
hr: jedno vrhnje
hu: habtejszín
it: panna liquida
nl: vloeibare room
sv: flytande grädde, matgrädde

en: double cream
de: Doppelrahm
es: crema doble
hr: dupla krema
it: panna doppia

en: whole cream, full cream
ca: crema de llet sencera, nata sencera
de: Vollrahm, ganze Sahne
es: crema de leche entera, nata entera
fi: täyskerma, täysrasvainen kerma
fr: crème entière
hr: cijela krema
hu: teljes tejszín
it: panna intera
nl: volle room

en: heavy cream
nb: kremfløte

en: whipping cream
da: piskefløde
es: crema batida, nata líquida
fi: kuohukerma
fr: crème à fouetter
hr: vrhnje za šlag
it: panna da montare
sv: vispgrädde

en: pasteurized whipping cream
de: Pasteurisierte Schlagsahne
fi: pastöroitu kuohukerma
hr: pasterizirano vrhnje za šlag
it: panna da montare pastorizzata
sv: pastöriserad vispgrädde

en: whipped cream
bg: бита сметана
ca: crema de llet montada, nata montada
de: Schlagsahne
es: crema de leche montada, nata montada
fi: kermavaahto
fr: crème fouettée
hr: šlag
hu: tejszínhab
it: Panna montata
nl: slagroom
pl: bita śmietana, bitej śmietany

en: Skim milk and pasteurized cream
ca: crema de llet desnatat pasteuritzat, nata desnatat pasteuritzat
de: Magermilch und pasteurisiertes Sahne
es: crema de leche desnatada pasteurizada, nata desnatada pasteurizada
fi: rasvaton maito ja pastöroitu kerma
fr: lait écrémé et crème pasteurisés
hr: obrano mlijeko i pasterizirano vrhnje
it: latte scremato e panna pastorizzata

en: fresh cream
ca: nata fresca, crema de llet fresca
da: frisk fløde
de: Frische Sahne
es: Crema fresca, nata fresca
fr: crème fraîche
hr: svježa krema
hu: friss tejszín
it: Panna fresca
nl: verse room
pl: Świeża śmietana, śmietana kremówka, śmietanka kremówka
sv: Färsk grädde

en: sheeps cream
fr: crème de brebis

en: sour cream, soured cream, grade a cultured cream, cultured cream
ar: كريمة حامضة
bg: заквасена сметана
ca: Crema agra, crema àcida
da: syrnet fløde
de: saure Sahne, Sauerrahm
el: κρέμα γαλακτοσ
eo: Acidkremo
es: Crema agria, nata agria, nata ácida
fa: خامه ترش
fi: Hapankerma
fr: Crème aigre, crème sure, crème acidulée
he: שמנת חמוצה
hr: kiselo vrhnje
hu: Tejföl
id: Krim asam
is: Sýrður rjómi
it: Panna acida
ko: 사워크림
lv: skābais krējums
ms: Krim masam
nl: Zure room
nn: romme
pl: Kwaśna śmietana
pt: Creme azedo, nata ácida
sk: Kyslá smotana
sv: Gräddfil
vi: Kem chua
zh: 酸忌廉

en: smetana
az: Xama
be: Смятана
bs: Pavlaka
ca: Smetana
cs: Zakysaná smetana
cv: Хăйма
da: Smetana
de: Schmetten
es: Smetana
et: Hapukoor
eu: Smetana
fi: Smetana
fr: Smetana
gl: Smetana
hr: smetana
hy: Թթվասեր
it: Smetana
ja: スメタナ
ka: არაჟანი
kk: Қаймақ
ko: 스메타나
lt: Grietinė
mk: Павлака
ms: Smetana
nb: Smetana
nl: Smetana
pl: Śmietana
ro: Smântână
ru: Сметана
sl: kisla smetana
sr: Павлака
sv: Smetana
uk: Сметана
uz: Smetana
vi: Smetana
zh: 斯美塔那酸奶油

en: crème fraîche
xx: crème fraîche, cremefraiche
de: Crème fraîche, creme fraiche
eu: esne-gain gordina, esne-gain freskoa
fi: ranskankerma, crème fraîche
fr: crème fraîche épaisse, crème fraîche fermentée
he: קרם פרש
hy: Կրեմ-ֆրեշ
ja: クレームフレーシュ
ko: 크렘 프레슈
ru: Крем-фреш
uk: Крем-фреш
vi: Kem fraîche
zh: 法式酸奶油